California, session 20252026, AB2255.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 84211 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 163 of Chapter 50 of the Statutes of 2021, is amended to read:84211. Each campaign statement required by this article shall contain all of the following information:(a) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign statement and the total cumulative amount of contributions received.(b) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign statement and the total cumulative amount of expenditures made.(c) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign statement from persons who have given a cumulative amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(d) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign statement from persons who have given a cumulative amount of less than one hundred dollars ($100).(e) The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the campaign statement.(f) If the cumulative amount of contributions (including loans) received from a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more and a contribution or loan has been received from that person during the period covered by the campaign statement, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The date and amount received for each contribution received during the period covered by the campaign statement and whether the contribution was made in the form of a monetary contribution, in-kind contribution of goods or services, or a loan.(6) The cumulative amount of contributions.(g) If the cumulative amount of loans received from or made to a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, and a loan has been received from or made to a person during the period covered by the campaign statement, or is outstanding during the period covered by the campaign statement, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The original date and amount of each loan.(6) The due date and interest rate of the loan.(7) The cumulative payment made or received to date at the end of the reporting period.(8) The balance outstanding at the end of the reporting period.(9) The cumulative amount of contributions.(h) For each person, other than the filer, who is directly, indirectly, or contingently liable for repayment of a loan received or outstanding during the period covered by the campaign statement, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The amount that person’s maximum liability outstanding.(i) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign statement to persons who have received one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(j) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign statement to persons who have received less than one hundred dollars ($100).(k) For each person to whom an expenditure of one hundred dollars ($100) or more has been made during the period covered by the campaign statement, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) The date and amount of each expenditure.(4) A brief description of the consideration for which each expenditure was made.(5) In the case of an expenditure which is a contribution to a candidate, elected officer, or committee or an independent expenditure to support or oppose a candidate or measure, in addition to the information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the date of the contribution or independent expenditure, the cumulative amount of contributions made to a candidate, elected officer, or committee, or the cumulative amount of independent expenditures made relative to a candidate or measure; the full name of the candidate, and the office and district for which the candidate seeks nomination or election, or the number or letter of the measure; and the jurisdiction in which the measure or candidate is voted upon.(6) The information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, for each person, if different from the payee, who has provided consideration for an expenditure of five hundred dollars ($500) or more during the period covered by the campaign statement.For purposes of subdivisions (i), (j), and (k) only, the terms “expenditure” or “expenditures” mean any individual payment or accrued expense, unless it is clear from surrounding circumstances that a series of payments or accrued expenses are for a single service or product.(l) In the case of a controlled committee, an official committee of a political party, or an organization formed or existing primarily for political purposes, the amount and source of any miscellaneous receipt.(m) If a committee is listed pursuant to subdivision (f), (g), (h), (k), (l), or (p), the number assigned to the committee by the Secretary of State shall be listed, or, if a number has not been assigned, the full name and street address of the treasurer of the committee.(n) In a campaign statement filed by a candidate who is a candidate in both a state primary and general election, such a candidate’s controlled committee, or a committee primarily formed to support or oppose such a candidate, the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of expenditures made for the period of January 1 through June 30 and the total amount of contributions received and expenditures made for the period of July 1 through December 31.(o) The full name, residential or business address, email address, and telephone number of the filer, or, in the case of a campaign statement filed by a committee defined by subdivision (a) of Section 82013, the name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the committee and of the committee treasurer. In the case of a committee defined by subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, the name that the filer uses on campaign statements shall be the name by which the filer is identified for other legal purposes or any name by which the filer is commonly known to the public.(p) If the campaign statement is filed by a candidate, the name, street address, and treasurer of any committee of which the candidate has knowledge which has received contributions or made expenditures on behalf of the candidate’s candidacy and whether the committee is controlled by the candidate.(q) A contribution need not be reported nor shall it be deemed accepted if it is not cashed, negotiated, or deposited and is returned to the contributor before the closing date of the campaign statement on which the contribution would otherwise be reported.(r) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k) and 50 percent or more of the business entity is owned by a candidate or person controlling the committee, by an officer or employee of the committee, or by a spouse of any of these individuals, the committee’s campaign statement shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(s) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k), and a candidate or person controlling the committee, an officer or employee of the committee, or a spouse of any of these individuals is an officer, partner, consultant, or employee of the business entity, the committee’s campaign statement shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(t) If the campaign statement is filed by a committee, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, information sufficient to identify the nature and interests of the filer, including:(1) If the filer is an individual, the name and address of the filer’s employer, if any, or the filer’s principal place of business if the filer is self-employed, and a description of the business activity in which the filer or the filer’s employer is engaged.(2) If the filer is a business entity, a description of the business activity in which it is engaged.(3) If the filer is an industry, trade, or professional association, a description of the industry, trade, or profession which it represents, including a specific description of any portion or faction of the industry, trade, or profession which the association exclusively or primarily represents.(4) If the filer is not an individual, business entity, or industry, trade, or professional association, a statement of the person’s nature and purposes, including a description of any industry, trade, profession, or other group with a common economic interest which the person principally represents or from which its membership or financial support is principally derived.(u) (1) A Except as provided in paragraph (2), a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office for the controlling candidate shall report additional information about an expenditure as provided in paragraph (2) (3) on the committee’s campaign statement if both of the following apply:(A) The candidate will not appear on the ballot at the next election.(B) The committee makes expenditures to a single person totaling twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more in the aggregate during the reporting period.(2) (A) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a committee established for the reelection of the controlling candidate to the same office.(B) Paragraph (1) does not apply with regard to expenditures for contributions or credit card payments.(2)(3) A committee subject to the reporting requirement in paragraph (1) shall include all of the following information on the campaign statement:(A) The full name and street address of the person to whom the expenditures were made that meet or exceed the threshold in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(B) The amount of each expenditure.(C) A description of any consideration for which each expenditure was made. made, including the specific political, legislative, or governmental purpose that is satisfied by the payment.(D) If applicable, the relationship of the person or reportable subvendor to the candidate or any individual with authority to approve the expenditure of campaign funds held by the committee. the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff. A relationship shall be reported pursuant to this subparagraph if the person or reportable subvendor is any of the following:(i) An immediate family member of the candidate.(ii) A member of the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff.(iii) An immediate family member of a member of the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff.SEC. 2. Section 84211 of the Government Code, as amended by Section 33 of Chapter 278 of the Statutes of 2025, is amended to read:84211. Each campaign report required by Sections 84200 and 84200.5 shall contain all of the following information:(a) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of contributions received.(b) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report and the total cumulative amount of expenditures made.(c) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report from persons who have given a cumulative amount of one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(d) The total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign report from persons who have given a cumulative amount of less than one hundred dollars ($100).(e) The balance of cash and cash equivalents on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the campaign report.(f) If the cumulative amount of contributions (including loans) received from a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more and a contribution or loan has been received from that person during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The date and amount received for each contribution received during the period covered by the campaign report and whether the contribution was made in the form of a monetary contribution, in-kind contribution of goods or services, or a loan.(6) The cumulative amount of contributions.(g) If the cumulative amount of loans received from or made to a person is one hundred dollars ($100) or more, and a loan has been received from or made to a person during the period covered by the campaign report, or is outstanding during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The original date and amount of each loan.(6) The due date and interest rate of the loan.(7) The cumulative payment made or received to date at the end of the reporting period.(8) The balance outstanding at the end of the reporting period.(9) The cumulative amount of contributions.(h) For each person, other than the filer, who is directly, indirectly, or contingently liable for repayment of a loan received or outstanding during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) That person’s occupation.(4) The name of that person’s employer, or, if self-employed, the name of the business.(5) The amount that person’s maximum liability outstanding.(i) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received one hundred dollars ($100) or more.(j) The total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign report to persons who have received less than one hundred dollars ($100).(k) For each person to whom an expenditure of one hundred dollars ($100) or more has been made during the period covered by the campaign report, all of the following:(1) That person’s full name.(2) That person’s street address.(3) The date and amount of each expenditure.(4) A brief description of the consideration for which each expenditure was made.(5) In the case of an expenditure which is a contribution to a candidate, elected officer, or committee or an independent expenditure to support or oppose a candidate or measure, in addition to the information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, the date of the contribution or independent expenditure, the cumulative amount of contributions made to a candidate, elected officer, or committee, or the cumulative amount of independent expenditures made relative to a candidate or measure; the full name of the candidate, and the office and district for which the candidate seeks nomination or election, or the number or letter of the measure; and the jurisdiction in which the measure or candidate is voted upon.(6) The information required in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, for each person, if different from the payee, who has provided consideration for an expenditure of five hundred dollars ($500) or more during the period covered by the campaign report.For purposes of subdivisions (i), (j), and (k) only, the terms “expenditure” or “expenditures” mean any individual payment or accrued expense, unless it is clear from surrounding circumstances that a series of payments or accrued expenses are for a single service or product.(l) In the case of a controlled committee, an official committee of a political party, or an organization formed or existing primarily for political purposes, the amount and source of any miscellaneous receipt.(m) If a committee is listed pursuant to subdivision (f), (g), (h), (k), (l), or (p), the number assigned to the committee by the Secretary of State shall be listed, or, if a number has not been assigned, the full name and street address of the treasurer of the committee.(n) In a campaign report filed by a candidate who is a candidate in both a state primary and general election, such a candidate’s controlled committee, or a committee primarily formed to support or oppose such a candidate, the total amount of contributions received and the total amount of expenditures made for the period of January 1 through June 30 and the total amount of contributions received and expenditures made for the period of July 1 through December 31.(o) The full name, residential or business address, email address, and telephone number of the filer, or, in the case of a campaign report filed by a committee defined by subdivision (a) of Section 82013, the name, street address, email address, and telephone number of the committee and of the committee treasurer. In the case of a committee defined by subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, the name that the filer uses on campaign reports shall be the name by which the filer is identified for other legal purposes or any name by which the filer is commonly known to the public.(p) A contribution need not be reported nor shall it be deemed accepted if it is not cashed, negotiated, or deposited and is returned to the contributor before the closing date of the campaign report on which the contribution would otherwise be reported.(q) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k) and 50 percent or more of the business entity is owned by a candidate or person controlling the committee, by an officer or employee of the committee, or by a spouse of any of these individuals, the committee’s campaign report shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(r) If a committee primarily formed for the qualification or support of, or opposition to, an initiative or ballot measure is required to report an expenditure to a business entity pursuant to subdivision (k), and a candidate or person controlling the committee, an officer or employee of the committee, or a spouse of any of these individuals is an officer, partner, consultant, or employee of the business entity, the committee’s campaign report shall also contain, in addition to the information required by subdivision (k), that person’s name, the relationship of that person to the committee, and a description of that person’s ownership interest or position with the business entity.(s) If the campaign report is filed by a committee, as defined in subdivision (b) or (c) of Section 82013, information sufficient to identify the nature and interests of the filer, including:(1) If the filer is an individual, the name and address of the filer’s employer, if any, or the filer’s principal place of business if the filer is self-employed, and a description of the business activity in which the filer or the filer’s employer is engaged.(2) If the filer is a business entity, a description of the business activity in which it is engaged.(3) If the filer is an industry, trade, or professional association, a description of the industry, trade, or profession which it represents, including a specific description of any portion or faction of the industry, trade, or profession which the association exclusively or primarily represents.(4) If the filer is not an individual, business entity, or industry, trade, or professional association, a statement of the person’s nature and purposes, including a description of any industry, trade, profession, or other group with a common economic interest which the person principally represents or from which its membership or financial support is principally derived.(t) (1) A Except as provided in paragraph (2), a candidate controlled committee established for an elective office for the controlling candidate shall report additional information about an expenditure as provided in paragraph (2) (3) on the committee’s campaign report if both of the following apply:(A) The candidate will not appear on the ballot at the next election.(B) The committee makes expenditures to a single person totaling twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more in the aggregate during the reporting period.(2) (A) Paragraph (1) does not apply to a committee established for the reelection of the controlling candidate to the same office.(B) Paragraph (1) does not apply with regard to expenditures for contributions or credit card payments.(2)(3) A committee subject to the reporting requirement in paragraph (1) shall include all of the following information on the campaign report:(A) The full name and street address of the person to whom the expenditures were made that meet or exceed the threshold in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1).(B) The amount of each expenditure.(C) A description of any consideration for which each expenditure was made. made, including the specific political, legislative, or governmental purpose that is satisfied by the payment.(D) If applicable, the relationship of the person or reportable subvendor to the candidate or any individual with authority to approve the expenditure of campaign funds held by the committee. the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff. A relationship shall be reported pursuant to this subparagraph if the person or reportable subvendor is any of the following:(i) An immediate family member of the candidate.(ii) A member of the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff.(iii) An immediate family member of a member of the candidate’s campaign or officeholder staff.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.SEC. 4. The Legislature finds and declares that this bill furthers the purposes of the Political Reform Act of 1974 within the meaning of subdivision (a) of Section 81012 of the Government Code.